Utah statutes.
58-16a-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), any person who violates the
unlawful conduct provision defined in Section 58-16a-501 or Subsection
58-1-501(1)(a) or (1)(c) is guilty of a third degree felony.
(2)  A person who violates Subsection 58-16a-501(3) is guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
